Hawaii statutes.
§514B-5
Conformance with county land use laws. Any condominium property regime established
under this chapter shall conform to the existing underlying county zoning for
the property and all applicable county permitting requirements adopted by the
county in which the property is located, including any supplemental rules
adopted by the county, pursuant to section 514B‑6, to ensure the
conformance of condominium property regimes to the purposes and provisions of
county zoning and development ordinances and chapter 205, including section
205-4.6 where applicable. In the case of a property which includes one or more
existing structures being converted to condominium status, the condominium
property regime shall comply with section 514B‑32(a)(13) or 514B‑84(a). [L 2004, c 164, pt of §2; am L
2014, c 49, §3]

Note

Applicability of 2014 amendment. L 2014, c 49, §10.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next